Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
A law enforcement unit, as defined in ORS 181A.355, shall participate  in the
National Use-of-Force Data Collection operated by the Federal Bureau of Investigation.
SECTION 2. The Oregon  Criminal Justice Commission shall analyze data from the Na-
tional Use-of-Force Data Collection operated by the  Federal Bureau of Investigation and re-
port annually in the manner provided in ORS 192.245 to an appropriate committee or interim
committee of the Legislative Assembly on the analysis.
SECTION 3. Notwithstanding any other provision  of law, the General Fund appropriation
made to the Oregon Criminal Justice Commission by  section 1, chapter ___, Oregon Laws
2021 (Enrolled House Bill 5005), for the biennium beginning July 1, 2021, is  increased by
$198,996 to implement the provisions of this 2021 Act.
SECTION 4. Notwithstanding any other provision  of law, the General Fund appropriation
made to the Department of Corrections by section  1 (1), chapter ___, Oregon Laws 2021
(Enrolled House Bill 5004), for the  biennium beginning July 1, 2021, for operations and health
services, is increased by $260,574 to implement the provisions of this 2021 Act.
Enrolled House Bill 2932 (HB 2932-B) Page 1
Passed by House June 24, 2021
..................................................................................
Timothy G. Sekerak, Chief Clerk of House
..................................................................................
Tina Kotek, Speaker of House
Passed by Senate June 26, 2021
..................................................................................
Peter Courtney, President of Senate
Received by Governor:
........................M.,........................................................., 2021
Approved:
........................M.,........................................................., 2021
..................................................................................
Kate Brown, Governor
Filed in Office of Secretary of State:
........................M.,........................................................., 2021
..................................................................................
Shemia Fagan, Secretary of State
Enrolled House Bill 2932 (HB 2932-B) Page 2